Rhode Island statutes. Title 10 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure in Particular Actions
Chapter 5 Attachment
10-5-43.
Prerequisites to dismissal of receivership.

If an attachment has been dissolved in the manner provided in §

10-5-42

, the proceedings for the appointment of a receiver shall not thereafter be dismissed and the receiver discharged, until all the assets which have come into his or her hands as receiver have been fully distributed or the claim upon which the attachment was made has been fully paid and discharged, unless the debtor, before the dismissal, deposits with the clerk of the court to which the original writ or writ of mesne process was returnable, such amount of money as the court before which the receivership proceedings are pending, after notice to the attaching creditor and a hearing, finds reasonable for the protection of his or her claim in the action in which the attachment was made. The clerk shall pay, from the amount so deposited, to the plaintiff, if final judgment or decree is in his or her favor, so much of the money as may be required to satisfy his or her execution and shall pay the balance, if any, to the defendant, and if judgment or decree in the action or cause is for defendant, in such event upon presentation of execution in his or her favor, the amount so deposited with actual accrued interest, if any, shall be immediately paid to the defendant, but such amount may at any time be paid by the clerk as the parties may by their agreement stipulate or as the court upon motion of any party in interest may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 351, § 31; P.L. 1932, ch. 1959, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 551, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-43

.

10-5-44.
Dissolution of attachment of real property for want of action.

The lien of any attachment of real property filed on or before May 5, 1955, in which a decision has not been entered, shall be dissolved whenever the cause shall hereafter remain without action for a period of six (6) years, as shown by the court docket. The lien of any attachment of real property filed after May 5, 1955, in which a decision shall not have been entered, shall be dissolved whenever the cause shall remain without action for a period of six (6) years, as shown by the court docket. A certificate of the clerk of the court in which a cause is pending, to the effect that the cause has remained without action for a period of six (6) years, shall be entitled to be recorded, upon payment of the fee for the recording, in the records of land evidence wherever any such attachment may have been filed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 551, § 3; P.L. 1955, ch. 3579, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-44

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 95.

10-5-45.
Dissolution of attachment for failure to file complaint.

An attachment of property on any writ hereafter issued shall be dissolved if the complaint in the action is not filed with the court either before or within thirty (30) days after the attachment is made. A certificate signed by the clerk of the court to which the writ is returnable which states that according to the records of the court the complaint has not been filed shall be sufficient authority to dissolve the attachment and to release any funds or properties attached pursuant to the writ and shall further serve to release the garnishee from any liability that might exist by virtue of the issuance of the writ.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 1, § 13.

10-5-46.
Dissolution of attachment of real estate after 20 years.

In addition to the remedies provided by §§

10-5-44

,

10-5-45

, and

9-25-23

any attachment levied against real estate, heretofore or hereafter of record, shall be dissolved, and no longer be a lien upon the real estate described or referred to in the attachment, after the expiration of a period of twenty (20) years from the date of the recording of the attachment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 225, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 199, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 28.